Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.110

Powers and duties.

The director of agriculture shall exercise all powers and perform all duties prescribed by law with respect to grains, grain and hay products, grain and terminal warehouses, commercial feeds, commercial fertilizers, and chemical pesticides.

He or she shall enforce and supervise the administration of all laws relating to grains, grain and hay products, grain and terminal warehouses, commercial feeds, commercial fertilizers, and chemical pesticides.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5105; 1983 c 248 s 9; 1967 c 240 s 11; 1965 c 8 s 43.23.110. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 94; RRS s 10852.]

NOTES:

Commercial fertilizers: Chapter 15.54 RCW.

Grain and terminal warehouses: Chapter 22.09 RCW.

Quarantine: Chapter 17.24 RCW.

Seeds: Chapter 15.49 RCW.

Weeds: Chapters 17.04 and 17.06 RCW.